California statutes. Education Code
It is the intent of the Legislature that public museums established pursuant to this chapter shall be funded primarily by private funds. The board of supervisors of the county in which such a public museum is located is authorized, but not required, to allocate county funds for the support of such museum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Claims [19690. - 19690.]

19690.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Biennial Election of Trustees [19700. - 19702.]

19700.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this article, the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code) shall govern and control the conduct of elections pursuant to this chapter. Elections shall be held biennially in the district on the same day as the school district election as specified in Section 5000 in the odd-numbered years.

(b) The trustees shall hold office for the term of four years beginning on the first Friday in December next succeeding their appointment or election.

(c) The members of the first board of library trustees appointed or elected in a district shall, at their first meeting, so classify themselves by lot that their terms shall expire: two on the first Friday in December of the first odd-numbered calendar year next succeeding their appointment or election, and three on the first Friday in December of the second succeeding odd-numbered calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19701.

The number of library trustees for any library district established under the provisions of this chapter is five.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19702.

Every person who is registered to vote in the library district where the election is held at least 29 days before the election, may vote at the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1376.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bonds [19720. - 19734.]

19720.

The board of trustees of any library district may, when in their judgment it is deemed advisable, and shall upon a petition of 50 or more taxpayers and residents of the library district, call an election and submit to the electors of the district the question of whether the bonds of the district shall be issued and sold for the purpose of raising money for any or all of the following:

(a) The purchase of suitable lots.

(b) Procuring plans and specifications and erecting a suitable building.

(c) Furnishing and equipping the building, and fencing and ornamenting the grounds, for the accommodation of the public library.

(d) Any or all of the purposes of this chapter.

(e) Liquidating any indebtedness incurred for the purposes.

(f) Refunding any outstanding valid indebtedness, evidenced by bonds or warrants of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19721.

The election shall be called by posting notices, signed by the board, in three of the most public places in the district, for not less than 20 days before the election, and by publishing the notice not less than once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper published in the district if there is one, or if there is none, in a newspaper published in the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19722.

The notice shall contain:

(a) Time and place of holding the election.

(b) The names of inspectors and judges to conduct the election.

(c) The hours during the day in which the polls will be open.

(d) The amount and denomination of the bonds, the rate of interest, and the number of years, not exceeding 40, the whole or any part of the bonds are to be run.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19723.

The election shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions relating to the election of trustees, insofar as they are applicable to the election for bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19724.

Voting shall be by ballot, without reference to the general election law in regard to form of ballot, or manner of voting. The ballots shall have printed on them the words “Shall the measure (stating the nature thereof) be adopted?” To the right or below the statement of the measure to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the measure. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s vote shall be counted against its adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 7.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

19725.

On the seventh day after the election, at 8 o'clock p.m., the returns having been made to the board of trustees, the board shall meet and canvass the returns, and if it appears that more than one-half of the votes cast at the election are in favor of issuing the bonds, then the board shall cause an entry of the fact to be made upon its minutes and shall certify to the board of supervisors, all the proceedings had in the premises. Thereupon the board of supervisors shall issue the bonds of the district, to the number and amount provided in the proceedings, payable out of the building fund of the district, naming the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19726.

The money shall be raised by taxation upon the taxable property in the district, for the redemption of the bonds and the payment of the interest thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19727.

The total amount of bonds issued shall not exceed 5 percent of the taxable property of the district, as shown by the last equalized assessment book of the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19728.

The board of supervisors by an order entered upon its minutes shall prescribe the form of the bonds and of the interest coupons attached thereto, and shall fix the time when the whole or any part of the principal of the bonds shall be payable, which shall not be more than 40 years from the date thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19729.

The bonds shall not bear a greater amount of interest than 6 percent, to be payable annually or semiannually. The bonds shall be sold in the manner prescribed by the board of supervisors, but for not less than par, and the proceeds of the sale thereof shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the building fund of the library district, and shall be drawn out for the purposes for which the bonds were issued as other library moneys are drawn out.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19730.

The board of supervisors, at the time of making the levy of taxes for county purposes, shall levy a tax for that year upon the taxable property in the district, at the equalized assessed value thereof for that year, for the interest and redemption of the bonds. The tax shall not be less than sufficient to pay the interest of the bonds for that year, and such portion of the principal as is to become due during the year. In any event the tax shall be high enough to raise, annually, for the first half of the term the bonds have to run, a sufficient sum to pay the interest thereon, and during the balance of the term, high enough to pay the annual interest and to pay, annually, a proportion of the principal of the bonds equal to a sum produced by taking the whole amount of the bonds outstanding and dividing it by the number of years the bonds then have to run.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19731.

All money levied, when collected, shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the library district, and shall be used for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds, and for no other purpose. The principal and interest on the bonds shall be paid by the county treasurer, upon the warrant of the county auditor, out of the fund provided therefor. The county auditor shall cancel and file with the county treasurer the bonds and coupons as rapidly as they are paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19732.

Whenever any bonds issued under this article remain unsold for the period of six months after having been offered for sale in the manner prescribed by the board of supervisors, the board of trustees of the library district for or on account of which the bonds were issued, or of any library district composed wholly or partly of territory which, at the time of holding the election authorizing the issuance of the bonds, was embraced within the district for or on account of which the bonds were issued, may petition the board of supervisors to cause the unsold bonds to be withdrawn from market and canceled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19733.

Upon receiving the petition, signed by a majority of the members of the board of trustees, the supervisors shall fix a time for hearing the petition, which shall be not more than 30 days thereafter, and shall cause a notice, stating the time and place of hearing, and the object of the petition in general terms, to be published for 10 days prior to the day of hearing, in some newspaper published in the library district, if there is one, and if there is no newspaper published in the library district, then in a newspaper published at the county seat of the county in which the library district or part thereof is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19734.

At the time and place designated in the notice for hearing the petition, or at any subsequent time to which the hearing is postponed, the supervisors shall hear any reasons that are submitted for or against the granting of the petition, and if they deem it for the best interests of the library district that the unsold bonds be canceled, they shall make and enter an order in the minutes of their proceedings that the unsold bonds be canceled. Thereupon the bonds, and the vote by which they were authorized to be issued, shall cease to be of any validity whatever.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. California Freedom to Read Act [19800. - 19802.]

19800.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Freedom to Read Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 941, Sec. 1.   (AB 1825)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19801.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Libraries are essential for information, education, and enlightenment of all people of the community the library serves.

(b) Libraries provide access to books that offer teachable moments for readers of all ages and expand our understanding of people with different backgrounds, ideas, and beliefs.

(c) A person’s right to use a library should not be denied or abridged solely because of personal characteristics, age,
 background, or views.

(d) Removing and banning books from public libraries are dangerous acts of government censorship and erode our country’s commitment to freedom of expression and the right to receive information.

(e) Librarians are professionals trained to not impose their own thoughts and opinions on which ideas are right, but to make knowledge and ideas available so that people have the freedom to choose what to read.

(f) Librarians and library staff receive extensive professional training to develop and curate collections to meet the broad and diverse interests of their communities, which include, but are not limited to, literary value and developmental appropriateness of material.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 941, Sec. 1.   (AB 1825)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19802.

(a) (1) Every public library jurisdiction that directly receives any state funding, including, but not limited to, state funding pursuant to this part, shall establish, adopt, and maintain a written and publicly accessible collection development policy for its public libraries by January 1, 2026, and shall submit that collection development policy to the State Librarian. The State Librarian or their designee may provide technical assistance to public libraries in developing their collection development
 policy. The collection development policy, at a minimum, shall do all of the following:

(A) Establish a process for community members to share their concerns regarding library materials and to request that library materials be reconsidered for inclusion in the library’s collection.

(B) Guide the selection and deselection of library materials.

(C) Acknowledge that the public library’s collection meets the broad and diverse interests of the community and respect both the library’s autonomy and their specific community needs.

(D) Establish that the public library serves as a center for voluntary inquiry and the
 dissemination of information and ideas.

(E) Acknowledge that library materials should be provided for the interest, information, and enlightenment of all people, and should present diverse points of view in the collection as a whole.

(F) Acknowledge the right of the public to receive access to a range of social, political, aesthetic, moral, and other ideas and experiences.

(2) A librarian, library media specialist, other employee, or contractor at a public library shall not be subject to termination, demotion, discipline, or retaliation for either of the following:

(A) Refusing to remove a library material before it has been reviewed in accordance with the public
 library’s process for the reconsideration of library materials established pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(B) Making displays, acquisitions, or programming decisions that the employee or contractor believes, in good faith, are in accordance with the requirements of this section.

(b) (1) The governing board or body of a public library, or any body or commission designated to review the procurement, retention, or circulation of, or access to, library materials, shall not proscribe or prohibit the circulation or procurement of, or access to, any library materials in a public library because of the topic addressed by the materials or because of the views, ideas, or opinions contained in those materials.

(2) (A) Library materials in public libraries shall not be excluded, and access to library materials shall not be limited, solely on the bases of any of the following:

(i) The race, nationality, gender identity, sexual orientation, religion, disability, political affiliation, or any other characteristic listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, or the socioeconomic status of a subject of the library materials, an author of the library materials, the source of the library materials, or the perceived or intended audience for the library materials.

(ii) The library materials contain inclusive and diverse perspectives.

(iii) The library materials may include sexual content, unless that content qualifies as obscene under United States Supreme Court precedent.

(B) This paragraph does not apply to library materials excluded, or for which access is limited, pursuant to a library maintenance and deaccession policy.

(3) The governing board or body of a public library, or any body or commission designated to review the procurement, retention, or circulation of, or access to, library materials, shall not create policies or procedures that limit or restrict access to
 library materials offered by the public library unless the policies or procedures are adopted to preserve the safety or security of the library materials, are time, place, and manner restrictions not based on the content of materials, or are programs that provide for the effective management of the library and its resources to preserve access for all library users.

(c) A person’s right to use a public library and its resources shall not be denied or abridged solely because of personal characteristics, age, background, or views.

(d) All people, regardless of personal characteristics, age, background, or views, possess a right to privacy and confidentiality in the materials they borrow from libraries.

(e) This section applies to a public library, as defined in Section 18015, including any public library operated on a contractual basis, or by a city, including a general law or charter city, county, special district, or joint powers authority, except that it does not apply to any school library, as defined in Section 18710, or any library operated by the governing board of a school district, a county board of education, or the governing body of a charter school.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Library materials” includes, but is not limited to, books, periodicals and serials, audio materials, audiovisual materials, instructional materials, maps, databases, government documents, records, photographs, and all other similar materials,
 whether in tangible or electronic form. “Library materials” does not include hardware, tools, instruments, computers, appliances, or other items that are not for the primary purpose of conveying ideas or information.

(2) “Public library jurisdiction” means a county, city and county, city, or any district that is authorized by law to provide public library services and that operates a public library described in subdivision (e).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 941, Sec. 1.   (AB 1825)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.5. Miscellaneous Provisions [19900. - 19911.]



  ARTICLE 1. Deposit of Newspapers in Libraries [19900. - 19902.]

19900.

The board of supervisors of any county may authorize the county recorder to deposit with any free public library maintained at the county seat, or with the State Library, such newspaper files, or portions thereof, as may be in the custody of the recorder by virtue of Chapter 110 of the Statutes of 1862, relating to the purchase and preservation of newspapers, or by virtue of any other act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19901.

Before making the deposit, the board of supervisors shall obtain from the board of trustees or authorities in charge of the free public library, or the State Librarian, as the case may be, an agreement that it will properly preserve and care for the newspaper files, and make them accessible to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 172.)
-------------------------------------------

19902.

The board of supervisors of any county may authorize the boards of trustees or other authorities in charge of any free public library with which newspaper files have been deposited in accordance with Section 19900 to deposit the newspaper files with the State Library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Offenses Against Libraries [19910. - 19911.]

19910.

Any person who maliciously cuts, tears, defaces, breaks, or injures any book, map, chart, picture, engraving, statue, coin, model, apparatus, or other work of literature, art, mechanics, or object of curiosity, deposited in any public library, gallery, museum, collection, fair, or exhibition, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The parent or guardian of a minor who willfully and maliciously commits any act within the scope of this section shall be liable for all damages so caused by the minor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19911.

Any person who willfully detains any book, newspaper, magazine, pamphlet, manuscript, or other property belonging to any public or incorporated library, reading room, museum, or other educational institution, for 30 days after notice in writing to return the article or property, given after the expiration of the time for which by the rules of the institution the article or property may be kept, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The parent or guardian of a minor who willfully and maliciously commits any act within the scope of this section shall be liable for all damages so caused by the minor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. California Library Construction and Renovation Bond Act of 1988 [19950. - 19981.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [19950. - 19952.]

19950.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Library Construction and Renovation Bond Act of 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19951.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The public library is a supplement to the formal system of free public education, a source of information and inspiration to persons of all ages, cultural backgrounds, and economic statuses, and a resource for continuing education and reeducation beyond the years of formal education, and therefore deserves adequate financial support from government at all levels.

(b) It is in the interest of the people and of the state that there be a general diffusion of information and knowledge through the continued operation of free public libraries. This diffusion is a matter of general concern inasmuch as it is the duty of the state to provide encouragement to the voluntary lifelong learning of the people of the state.

(c) Many existing public library facilities are not safe, efficient, or accessible for use, adequate for the size of the communities they serve, or otherwise capable of providing the public library services needed by the communities they serve.

(d) Many communities that are populous enough to require a public library facility do not have one.

(e) Local public library authorities do not have sufficient funds to construct or rehabilitate necessary public library facilities.

(f) Funding to meet the need for public library facilities, which is beyond the ability of local government to supply, is most appropriately met by a partnership of state and local governments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19952.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the California Library Construction and Renovation Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 19972.

(b) “Fund” means the California Library Construction and Restoration Fund created pursuant to Section 19955.

(c) “Board” means the California Library Construction and Renovation Board. The board includes the State Librarian, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, the Assembly Member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, and the Senator appointed by the Senate Rules Committee.

Legislative members of the board shall meet with, and participate in, the work of the board to the extent that their participation is not incompatible with their duties as Members of the Legislature. For the purposes of this chapter, Members of the Legislature who are members of the board shall constitute a joint legislative committee on the subject matter of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California Library Construction and Renovation Program [19955. - 19967.]

19955.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the California Library Construction and Renovation Fund, which is hereby created. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund shall be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19956.

All moneys deposited in the fund shall be available for grants to any city, county, city and county, or district that is empowered at the time of the project application to own and maintain a facility for the acquisition, construction, remodeling, or rehabilitation of facilities for public library services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19957.

The grant funds authorized pursuant to Section 19956 and the matching funds provided pursuant to Section 19962 shall be used by the recipient for any of the following purposes:

(a) Acquisition or construction of new facilities or additions to existing facilities.

(b) Acquisition of land necessary for purposes of subdivision (a).

(c) Remodeling of existing facilities for energy conservation purposes.

(d) Remodeling of existing facilities to provide access for the disabled.

(e) Rehabilitation of existing facilities to bring them into compliance with current health and safety requirements for public facilities.

(f) Procurement and installation of shelving fastened to the structure, and built-in equipment required to make a facility fully operable.

(g) Payment of fees charged by architects, engineers, and other design professionals whose services are required to plan and execute a project authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19957.5.

(a) An applicant for a grant for the acquisition, construction, remodeling, or rehabilitation of public library facilities under this chapter, as opposed to an application for a grant to acquire land pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19957, shall be eligible to apply for that grant if that applicant has an order issued by a court for possession of property in an eminent domain action pursuant to Section 1255.410 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 

(b) The terms “purchase of land” or “acquisition of land,” as used in this chapter, or in any rule, regulation, or policy adopted by the state librarian pursuant to Section 19960, shall include, but shall not be limited to, the acquisition of land by eminent domain and the eligible cost of acquisition of land by eminent domain shall be the fair market value of the property as defined by Sections 1263.310 to 1263.330, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure. However, the eligible cost of the land for a library project’s site acquired by eminent domain, if title to the land will not be transferred until after the grant application is submitted, shall be limited to the appraised value of the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 45, Sec. 1.   Effective June 3, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

19958.

No grant funds authorized pursuant to Section 19956 or matching funds provided pursuant to Section 19962 shall be used by a recipient for any of the following purposes:

(a) Books and other library materials.

(b) Administration costs of the project, including, but not limited to, the costs of all of the following:

(1) Preparation of the grant application.

(2) Procurement of matching funds.

(3) Conducting an election for obtaining voter approval of the project.

(4) Plan checking and code compliance inspections.

(c) Interest or other carrying charges for financing the project, including, but not limited to, costs of loans or lease-purchase agreements in excess of the direct costs of any of the authorized purposes specified in Section 19957.

(d) Any ongoing operating expenses for the facility, its personnel, supplies, or any other library operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19959.

All construction contracts for projects funded in part through grants awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be awarded through competitive bidding pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 20100) of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19960.

This chapter shall be administered by the State Librarian, who shall adopt rules, regulations, and policies for the implementation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19961.

A city, county, city and county, or district may apply to the State Librarian for a grant pursuant to this chapter, as follows:

(a) Each application shall be for a project for a purpose authorized by Section 19957.

(b) The applicant shall request not less than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) per project.

(c) No application shall be submitted for a project for which construction bids already have been advertised.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19962.

(a) Each grant recipient shall provide matching funds from any available source in an amount equal to 35 percent of the costs of the project. The remaining 65 percent of the costs of the project shall be provided through allocations from the fund.

(b) Qualifying matching funds shall be cash expenditures in the categories specified in Section 19957 which are made no earlier than three years prior to the submission of the application to the State Librarian. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), in-kind expenditures shall not qualify as matching funds.

(c) Land donated or otherwise acquired for use as a site for the facility, including, but not limited to, land purchased more than three years prior to the submission of the application to the State Librarian, may be credited towards the 35 percent matching funds requirement at its appraised value as of the date of the application.

(d) Cash expenditures not to exceed 10 percent for furnishings required to make the facility fully operable may be credited towards the 35 percent matching funds requirement. The recipient shall certify to the board that these furnishings have an estimated useful life of not less than 10 years.

(e) Architect fees for plans and drawings for library renovation and new construction, including plans and drawings purchased more than three years prior to the submission of the application to the State Librarian, may be credited towards the 35 percent matching funds requirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19963.

An amount not to exceed 1 percent of the cost of construction of the project may be used for appropriate works of art to enhance the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19964.

(a) The estimated costs of a project for which an application is submitted shall be consistent with normal public construction costs in the applicant’s area.

(b) An applicant wishing to construct a project with costs which exceed normal public construction costs in the applicant’s area may apply for a grant in an amount not to exceed 65 percent of the normal costs if the applicant certifies that it is capable of financing the remainder of the project costs from other sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19965.

Once an application has been approved by the board and included in the State Librarian’s request to the committee, the amount of funding to be provided to the applicant shall not be increased. Any actual changes in project costs shall be the full responsibility of the applicant. In the event that the amount of funding which is provided is greater than the cost of the project, the applicant shall return that portion of the funding which exceeds the cost of the project to the State Librarian.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19966.

In reviewing applications, the board shall consider all of the following factors:

(a) Needs of urban and rural areas.

(b) Projected population growth.

(c) Changing concepts of public library service.

(d) Distance of the proposed project from other existing and proposed facilities.

(e) Age and condition of the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19967.

(a) A facility, or the part thereof, acquired, constructed, remodeled, or rehabilitated with grants received pursuant to this chapter shall be dedicated to public library direct service use for a period of not less than 20 years following completion of the project, or the useful life of the building, whichever is longer.

(b) If the facility, or part thereof, acquired, constructed, remodeled, or rehabilitated with grants received pursuant to this chapter ceases to be used for public library direct service prior to the expiration of the period specified in subdivision (a), the board shall be entitled to recover from the grant recipient or the recipient’s successor in the maintenance of the facility, an amount which bears the same ratio to the value of the facility, or the appropriate part thereof, at the time it ceased to be used from public library direct service as the amount of the grant bore to the cost of the facility or appropriate part thereof. For purposes of this subdivision, the value of the facility, or the appropriate part thereof, shall be determined by the mutual agreement of the parties, or through an action brought for that purpose in the superior court.

(c) The board may release the grant recipient or the recipient’s successor in the maintenance of the facility from its obligation under subdivision (a), and waive the requirements of subdivision (b), if the board determines that so doing would not diminish the quality of public library service in the community served by the facility.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 16724 of the Government Code, moneys recovered pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be deposited in the fund, and shall be available for the purpose of awarding grants for other projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [19970. - 19981.]

19970.

Bonds in the total amount of seventy-two million four hundred five thousand dollars ($72,405,000) (exclusive of refunding bonds), or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 2.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, and approved in Prop. 85 on Nov. 8, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

19971.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19972.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the California Library Construction and Renovation Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this chapter, the California Library Construction and Renovation Finance Committee is the “committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee consists of the Treasurer, the State Librarian, the Director of Finance, or their designated representatives. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the California Library Construction and Renovation Board is designated the “board.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19973.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the actions specified in Article 2 (commencing with Section 19955), and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19974.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year, and it is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19975.
